Washington statutes.
RCW 36.72.090

Forms for public blanks, compilation of—Material to be provided by state.

The material used in such blank forms and the printing and binding thereof shall be provided for by the state in the same manner and under the same rules and regulations as other public printing is now provided for under the general statutes of this state.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.72.090. Prior: 1897 c 35 s 2; RRS s 4079.]